Utah statutes.
53B-1-104.   Membership of the board -- Student appointee -- Terms -- Oath -- Officers -- Committees -- Bylaws -- Meetings -- Quorum -- Vacancies -- Compensation.

(1) (a)  The board shall consist of 19 residents of the state.

(b) (i)  Fifteen members shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.

(ii) (A)  One additional member shall be appointed by the governor from nominations of the student body presidents council.

(B)  The student body presidents council shall nominate three qualified, matriculated students enrolled in the state institutions of higher education.

(C)  Student body presidents are not eligible for nomination.

(iii)  All appointments to the board shall be made on a nonpartisan basis.

(iv)  In making appointments to the board, the governor shall select:

(A)  at least two individuals who reside within a county of the fourth, fifth, or sixth class;

(B)  no more than six individuals who reside within a county of the first class;

(C)  the remaining individuals from the state at large with due consideration for geographical representation and diversity of exposure to the various institutions in the Utah System of Higher Education; and

(D)  at least three individuals with personal experience in career and technical education, which could include service on a campus board of directors.

(c) (i)  In addition to the members designated under Subsection (1)(b), two members of the State Board of Education, appointed by the chair of the State Board of Education, shall serve as nonvoting members of the board.

(ii)  A nonvoting State Board of Education member shall continue to serve as a member without a set term until the member is replaced by the chair of the State Board of Education.

(d) (i)  In addition to the members designated under Subsection (1)(b), one member of the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees, appointed by the chair of the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees, shall serve as a nonvoting member of the board.

(ii)  A nonvoting Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees member shall continue to serve as a member without a set term until the member is replaced by the chair of the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees.

(2) (a)  Five members of the board, other than the student member, the State Board of Education members, and the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees member, shall be appointed during each odd-numbered year to six-year staggered terms which commence on July 1 of the year of appointment.

(b) (i)  The student member shall be appointed for a one-year term and may be reappointed for one additional term.

(ii)  The student member has full voting rights and may vote on selection of a board chair or vice chair, but not serve in either office.

(c)  Board members shall hold office until their successors have been appointed and qualified.

(3) (a)  Each member of the board shall take the official oath of office before entering upon the duties of office.

(b)  The oath shall be filed with the Division of Archives and Records Services.

(4)  The board shall elect a chair and vice chair from its members who shall serve terms of two years and until their successors are chosen and qualified.

(5) (a)  The board shall appoint a secretary from the staff of its chief executive to serve at its discretion.

(b)  The secretary shall be a full-time employee who receives a salary set by the board.

(c)  The secretary shall record and maintain a record of all board meetings and perform other duties as the board directs.

(6)  The board shall appoint a treasurer who serves at the discretion of the board.

(7) (a)  The board may establish advisory committees.

(b)  The powers and authority of the board are nondelegable, except as specifically provided for in this title.

(c)  All matters requiring board determination shall be addressed in a properly convened meeting of the board or its executive committee.

(8)  The board shall enact bylaws for its own government not inconsistent with the constitution or the laws of this state.

(9) (a)  The board shall meet regularly upon its own determination.

(b)  The board may also meet, in full or executive session, at the request of its chair, its executive officer, or five members of the board.

(10)  A quorum of the voting members of the board is required to conduct its business and consists of nine members.

(11) (a)  A vacancy in the board occurring before the expiration of a voting member's full term shall be immediately filled by appointment by the governor with the consent of the Senate.

(b)  The appointee serves for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(12)  A board member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Amended by Chapter 5, 2011 Special Session 3

